California statutes. Public Utilities Code
On or before the 30th day prior to the end of each fiscal year, the general manager shall submit to the board a proposed budget covering all of the contemplated operations of the district for the following fiscal year. At that time a copy of the proposed budget shall be transmitted to the board of supervisors and to the city council of each city lying either in whole or in part within the boundaries of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101251.

Prior to the time the board finally adopts the budget, it shall hold a public hearing upon the proposed budget submitted by the general manager. Notice of the time and place of hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code and shall be made not later than the 15th day prior to the date of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101252.

The date of the hearing shall be fixed by the board and shall be not later than July 1 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101253.

At the time and place designated in the published notice, the board shall meet and consider the proposed budget. Any resident of the district may appear and be heard regarding the increase, decrease, or omission of any item in the proposed budget or for the inclusion of new items. All proposals for the increase of any item or for the inclusion of any additional items shall be submitted in writing to the general manager before the close of the public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101254.

The board may continue the hearing from day to day; provided the hearing shall be concluded not later than July 15 first following its commencement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101255.

After the conclusion of the hearing, and not later than August 1st of each year, and after making any revisions of the proposed budget which it may deem advisable either during or after the hearing, the board shall by resolution adopt the budget as finally determined by the board. Increases or additions shall not be made after the conclusion of the hearing, unless the items were proposed in writing and filed pursuant to Section 101253.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101256.

A copy of the budget as finally adopted by the board shall be filed with the county auditor pursuant to Section 53901 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Services of County and City Officers [101260. - 101260.]

101260.

Whenever the district avails itself of the services of any officer or department of the County of Kern, or of any city within the district, in the performance of any function of the district, the district shall reimburse the county or the city, as the case may be, for the reasonable value of any such service so performed in an amount, or at a rate of charge, to be fixed by the legislative body of the agency performing the service.

Reimbursement to the county for its services to the district in the collection of district taxes shall be subject to the limitation prescribed by Section 29142 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Taxation [101265. - 101274.]

101265.

(a) The district may cause to be levied and collected taxes for any lawful purpose, subject to a maximum limit of fifteen cents ($0.15) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation.

(b) The maximum limit may be increased to twenty-five cents ($0.25) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation, if approval is first obtained from the city council of each city lying entirely within the boundaries of the district and the board of supervisors.

(c) The maximum limit may be increased above the maximum limits as
 specified in subdivisions (a) and (b), if such a maximum limit is first approved by the majority of the voters voting at any general or special election on the proposition establishing such a maximum limit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101266.

If, in the opinion of the board, the transit operation revenues will not be sufficient to pay for any and all lawful purposes of the district, the board shall fix the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation for any such purpose or purposes and shall cause a tax to be levied therefor.

Any tax so levied shall be subject to the limitations prescribed by Sections 101265 and 101267.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101267.

The board shall, in addition to the general tax levy as set forth in Section 101265, levy and collect annually until the district’s bonds are paid, or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds as they become due, a tax sufficient to pay the annual interest on the bonds and such part of the principal thereof as becomes due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available. If the maturity of the indebtedness created by the issue of bonds begins more than one year after the date of the issuance thereof, the tax shall be levied and
 collected annually at the time and in the manner aforesaid, sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness as it falls due and to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal on or before maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101268.

On or before the second Monday in August of each year, the county auditor shall transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district referred to in Section 101270.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101269.

On or before the last Friday in July of each year, the board shall file with the board of supervisors and with the county auditor a statement in writing which shall contain the following:

(a) An estimate of the amount of money required to be raised by taxation during the fiscal year for the payment of the principal and interest on any bonded indebtedness of the district.

(b) An estimate of the amount of money required to be raised by taxation during the fiscal year for all other purposes of the district.

The statement shall be predicated upon the budget adopted pursuant to the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 101250) of Chapter 6 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101270.

Annually at the time of levying county taxes, the board of supervisors shall levy a tax upon all the taxable real and personal property within the district. Subject to the maximum limits prescribed by Section 101265, the rate shall be such as will produce, after due allowance for delinquency and cost of collection, the amounts determined by the board of directors as necessary to be raised by taxation and as set forth in the statement required by Section 101269. The tax rate so levied shall apply to all the taxable real and personal property within the district as they appear on the assessment roll of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101271.

The taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes and, when collected, shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the district, or to the treasurer of the district, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101272.

The performance of the acts provided for by this chapter shall constitute a valid assessment of the property within the district and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101273.

All taxes levied under this part are a lien on the property on which they are levied and shall become a lien at the same time as county taxes. The enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, and all of the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter are made a part of this part by specific reference so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101274.

Whenever any real property has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district treasurer, or deposited in the county treasury for the use of the district, as the case may be, in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Bonds [101280. - 101336.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance [101280. - 101298.]

101280.

The district may, from time to time, incur a bonded indebtedness as provided in this chapter to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing, or completing the whole, or any portion, of any transit facilities, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101281.

The district shall not incur a total bonded indebtedness which exceeds 5 percent of the assessed value of all the taxable real and personal property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101282.

Whenever the board, by resolution passed by vote of four-fifths of all its members, determines that the public interest or necessity demands the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any transit facilities or of any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, the cost of which will be too great to be paid out of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district, it may, at any subsequent meeting of the board, provide by ordinance for the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purpose set forth in the
 resolution to the voters of the district at a special bond election held for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101283.

In lieu of a resolution passed by the board, proceedings for the issuance of bonds for the purposes provided in this chapter may be initiated by petition of the voters of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101284.

The petition may be presented to the board, and shall be executed and attested in the same manner as provided a petition for the formation of the district in Article 2 (commencing with Section 101035) of Chapter 3 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101285.

Whenever any petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast within the district at the last general statewide election is presented to the board asking for the acquisition, construction, or completion of the whole, or any portion, of any transit facilities or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, and also asking that a bonded indebtedness be incurred to pay for the
 cost thereof, the secretary of the district shall forthwith transmit the petition to the county elections official for certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 117.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

101286.

Within 30 days after the receipt of the petition, the county elections official shall examine the petition and determine the number of valid signers thereof by comparing the signatures thereon with the signatures of registered voters as appear on the affidavits of voter registration on file with him or her. The county elections official then shall certify to the secretary of the district all the following:

(a) The total number of voters registered within the district at the time of the last
 general statewide election immediately preceding the filing of the petition.

(b) The total number of registered voters of the district who have signed the petition.

(c) The percentage which the number of such signers bears to the total number of voters registered to vote within the district at such time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 118.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

101287.

If the county elections official certifies that the percentage of registered voters signing the petition is less than that required by Section 101284, a supplemental petition may be presented to the secretary of the district within 30 days after the county elections official’s certification of the first petition. The supplemental petition shall thereupon be processed as provided in Sections 101284 and 101285.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

101288.

If the petition has been executed in the manner provided and by the required number of signers, the secretary of the district shall forthwith transmit to the board and to the general manager a copy of the petition, but without the signatures appended thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101289.

Upon receiving a petition so executed by the required number of signers, the board shall provide by ordinance for the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purpose set forth in the petition to the voters of the district at a special bond election held for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101290.

The ordinance calling a special bond election shall fix the date on which the election will be held, and the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against incurring the indebtedness. It shall also recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the transit facilities, works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property proposed to be acquired, constructed, or completed, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 7 percent per annum, payable semiannually or annually the
 first year and thereafter semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101291.

Propositions for incurring indebtedness for more than one object or purpose, or propositions proposed by resolution or petition, may be submitted at the same election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101292.

The bond election may be held separately, or it may be held on the same day as any other state, county, or city election, or any election held under the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code), and may be consolidated therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 209.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

101293.

If a special bond election is consolidated with any other election, the provisions of this article setting forth the procedure for the calling and holding of the special bond election shall be complied with, except that the ordinance calling the election need not set forth the election precincts, polling places, and officers of election who shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings calling the election with which the special bond election is consolidated, and shall refer to the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings by number and title, or by other definite description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101294.

The board shall cause the ordinance to be published in accord with Section 6061 of the Government Code; the publication shall be made not less than 30 and not more than 60 days prior to the day of the election. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101295.

If the ordinance calling the election so provides, the election shall be conducted by the county elections official in accord with the manner of holding the election prescribed by the board pursuant to the provisions of Section 101289.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

101296.

The board shall comply with Article 3 (commencing with Section 9160) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, the provisions of which are applicable to any bond election held pursuant to this article. In the event the election is not conducted by the county clerk, then whenever the words “county clerk” or “county elections official” appear in that article of the Elections Code, the words “secretary of the district” shall be substituted for the purposes of this article of this part. For the further purposes of this article, the following
 substitutions shall be made in all cases for the words set out in that article of the Elections Code: (a) “board of directors” in lieu of “board of supervisors”; and (b) “attorney for the district” in lieu of “district attorney or county counsel”.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

101297.

The votes of a majority of all the voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of bonds under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101298.

If the proposition submitted at a special bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the board shall not, within six months after the election, hold another special election for the submission of a proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness substantially the same as the proposition voted upon at the prior election, unless a petition, signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast within the district at the last general statewide election is filed with the board, requesting that the proposition, or a proposition substantially the same, be submitted at an election to be called for that purpose.

Any such petition may be presented in the same manner and shall be executed and attested and certified as provided in this article for a petition asking that a bonded indebtedness be incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form and Content [101300. - 101304.]

101300.

If the board has appointed a treasurer of the district pursuant to Section 101166, then the word “treasurer” as used in this chapter shall refer to such treasurer of the district so appointed. If the board has not so appointed a treasurer of the district, then the word “treasurer” as used in this chapter shall refer to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101301.

Bonds authorized by this chapter shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board, except that payment shall begin not later than 10 years from the date thereof and shall be completed in not more than 50 years from that date.

The board may divide any issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter into two or more series, and may fix different dates of issuance and different maturity dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of each series shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board, and the board shall fix a date not more than 10 years from the date of issuance of each series for the earliest
 maturity of such series, and shall fix a date not more than 50 years from the date of issuance of each series for the final maturity of such series.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of bonds, a district may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, of any denomination whatsoever, with or without coupon, and in such form as may be prescribed by the board, to be exchanged for definite bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101302.

The bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board shall determine and shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in the bonds, and with interest at the rate specified therein, payable semiannually or annually the first year and semiannually thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101303.

The board may, at any time prior to the issuance and sale of any bonds, provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity at not exceeding the par value and accrued interest plus a premium of not exceeding 5 percent upon the principal amount of the bonds, in which event the call price fixed by the board shall be set forth on the face of the bond. Notice of such redemption shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. The first publication shall be not more than 60 and not less than 30 days prior to the date fixed for redemption. After the date fixed for such redemption, interest
 on the bonds thereafter shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101304.

The bonds shall be signed by the president of the board or by such officer of the district as the board shall by resolution authorize and designate for that purpose. They shall also be signed by the treasurer, and be countersigned by the secretary. The coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and be signed by the treasurer. All signatures and countersignatures, except one of the signatures or countersignatures on the bonds, may be printed, lithographed, or engraved. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature is
 nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issue and Sale [101310. - 101312.]

101310.

The bonds may be issued and sold for not less than their par value, but otherwise as the board determines. Before selling any bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as the board may prescribe. Such notice shall be published at least twice pursuant to a provision of Article 4 (commencing with Section 6060), Chapter 1, Division 7, Title 1 of the Government Code. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the
 board may reject all bids received, if any, and either again give notice inviting bids or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101311.

All premiums and accrued interest received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds. The remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the district treasury, or in the county treasury, as the case may be, to the credit of the proper fund, and shall be used exclusively for the objects or purposes for which the bonds were voted; provided that, when such objects and purposes have been accomplished, any moneys remaining shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds, and that, when all principal of and interest on the bonds shall
 have been paid, any balance of money then remaining shall be transferred to the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101312.

In lieu of the immediate levy of a tax to pay the interest, or any part thereof, on any bonded indebtedness incurred in accordance with this chapter, the board may, in the estimate of the amount of money necessary to be raised by the bonds, include a sum sufficient to pay interest on all of the bonds, or part thereof, during the period of acquisition, construction, or completion, but for no period in excess of five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunding [101315. - 101321.]

101315.

Whenever the board, by resolution passed by a vote of four-fifths of all its members, determines that the refunding of the whole, or any portion of, the bonded indebtedness will be of advantage to the district, the board may refund the bonded indebtedness, or any portion thereof, and issue refunding bonds of the district therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101316.

The issuance of refunding bonds shall not be construed as the incurring or increase of an indebtedness within the meaning of this part, and the approval of the voters is not required for the issuance of refunding bonds. The board may provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity in the ordinance authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101317.

Except as otherwise provided, the provisions of this chapter shall substantially govern as to all matters pertaining to the issuance of refunding bonds, including and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the form, execution, issuance, maturity, redemption, refunding, validation, the payment of interest from bond funds, and the status of the bonds as investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101318.

Refunding bonds shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding the interest rate on the refunded bonds, but payment of the refunding bonds shall begin not later than one year from the date thereof and be completed in not more than 40 years from that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101319.

The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds shall be applied only to the purchase, or retirement at not more than par and accrued interest, or the call price, of the bonded indebtedness for which the refunding bonds were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101320.

In lieu of selling refunding bonds and using the proceeds to purchase or retire the bonds to be refunded, the board may exchange refunding bonds at not less than par and accrued interest for the bonds so refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101321.

Whenever outstanding bonds are refunded, they shall be surrendered to the treasurer of the district, or the county treasurer, as the case may be, who shall cancel them by endorsing on their face the manner in which the refunding was effected (whether by exchange or purchase, and the amount for which so purchased, if any) and by perforating through each bond and each coupon attached thereto the word “canceled” together with the date of cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Status as Investments [101325. - 101326.]

101325.

All bonds, including refunding bonds, issued by a district are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State School Fund and for all sinking funds under the control of the State Treasurer. Whenever any money or funds may by law be invested in, or loaned upon the security of, bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts, in the state, such money or funds may be invested in, or loaned upon the security of, the bonds of the district; and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts by law may be used as
 security for the faithful performance or execution of any court or private trust or of any other act, bonds of the district may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101326.

All bonds of the district, to the same extent as bonds of any other municipality, are legal for use by any state or national bank or banks in the state as security for the deposit of funds of the state or of any county, city and county, city, municipality, or other public or municipal corporation within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Validation [101330. - 101330.]

101330.

An action to determine the validity of bonds, including refunding bonds, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860), Title 10, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue Bonds [101335. - 101336.]

101335.

As an alternative procedure for the raising of funds, the district may issue bonds, payable from revenues of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions of which are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101336.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include transit facilities, and any and all parts thereof, and all additions, extensions, and improvements thereto, and all other facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district. A district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 for any one or more facilities or enterprises authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by a district or, in
 the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 for the acquisition, construction, and completion of any one of such facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the facilities or works authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Labor Provisions [101340. - 101348.]

101340.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection. It is declared to be in the public interest that the district shall not express any preference for one union over another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101341.

Whenever a majority of the employees employed by the district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization, the district, upon determining as provided in Section 101344 that the labor organization represents the employees in the appropriate unit, shall enter into a written contract with the accredited representative of the employees governing wages, salaries,
 hours, and working conditions. In case of a dispute over wages, salaries, hours, or working conditions, which is not resolved by negotiations in good faith between the district and the labor organization, the district and the labor organization may submit the dispute to the decision of the majority of an arbitration board, and the decision of the majority of the arbitration board shall be final.

The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district, and two representatives of the labor organization, and they shall endeavor to agree upon the selection of the fifth member. If they are unable to agree, the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list so supplied, and the name remaining after the labor organization and the district have stricken four names, shall be
 designated as the arbitrator. The labor organization and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike from the list. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding upon the parties. The expenses of arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties. Each party shall bear his or her own costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 132.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

101342.

In the event the board and the representatives of the employees do not agree to submit the dispute to an arbitration board as provided in Section 101341, the State Conciliation Service may be notified by either party that a dispute exists and that there is no agreement to arbitrate. The State Conciliation Service shall determine whether or not the dispute may be resolved by the parties and, if not, the issues concerning which the dispute exists. Upon such determination, the State Conciliation Service shall certify its findings to the Governor of the State of California, who shall, within 10 days of receipt of certification, appoint a factfinding commission consisting of
 three persons which shall immediately convene and inquire into and investigate the issues involved in the dispute. The commission shall report to the Governor within 30 days of the date of its creation.

After the creation of such commission and for 30 days after such commission has made its report to the Governor, no change, except by mutual agreement, shall be made by the parties to the controversy in the conditions out of which the dispute arose and service to the public shall be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101343.

(a) A contract or agreement shall not be made, or assumed under this part, with any labor organization, association, or group that denies membership to, or in any manner discriminates against, any employee on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence. 

(b) The district shall not discriminate with regard to employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

101344.

If there is a question whether a labor organization represents a majority of employees or whether the proposed unit is or is not appropriate, such matters shall be submitted to the State Conciliation Service for disposition. The State Conciliation Service shall promptly hold a public hearing after due notice to all interested parties and shall thereupon determine the unit appropriate for the purposes of collective bargaining. In making such determination and in establishing rules and regulations governing petitions and the conduct of hearings and elections, the State Conciliation Service shall be guided by relevant federal law and administrative practice, developed under
 the Labor-Management Relations Act, 1947, as presently amended.

The State Conciliation Service shall provide for an election to determine the question of representation and shall certify the results to the parties. Any certification of a labor organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation within such collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later. However, no collective bargaining agreement shall be construed to be a bar to representation proceedings for a period of more than two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

101345.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, the district shall assume and observe all existing labor contracts. To the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of such acquired public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination, subject to all the rights and benefits of this part, and these employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, vacation, and pension credits in accordance with the records and labor agreements of the acquired public
 utility. Members and beneficiaries of any pension or retirement system or other benefits established by that public utility shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations, and status with respect to such established system. No employee of any acquired public utility shall suffer any worsening of his wages, seniority, pension, vacation, or other benefits by reason of the acquisition.

The district may extend the benefits of this section to officers or supervisory employees of the acquired public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------
